Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB591.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1 of the act of November 22, 1978 (P.L.1166, No.274), referred to as the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency Law, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Law enforcement officer." The term shall have the same 1234567891011121314151617181920 meaning as the term "peace officer" under 18 Pa.C.S. § 501 (relating to definitions).* * *Section 2. Section 3 of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 3. Powers and duties of the commission.The commission shall have the power and its duty shall be:* * *(19) To offer and cause to be paid rewards of up to $50,000 for information leading to the arrest and conviction of perpetrators of an offense against a law enforcement officer under 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502 (relating to murder) or 2507 (relating to criminal homicide of law enforcement officer).Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 8.2. Constable William Davidson Reward Fund.(a) Establishment of fund.--The Constable William Davidson Reward Fund is established as a nonlapsing fund in the State Treasury.(b) Administration.--The fund shall be administered by the commission. The commission shall use money in the fund solely for the purpose specified under section 3(19).(c) Fund sources.--Funding shall consist of appropriations by the General Assembly.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Fund." The Constable William Davidson Reward Fund.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0591PN0599 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728